BrailleTables/de.ctb
###############################################################################
# BRLTTY - A background process providing access to the console screen (when in
#          text mode) for a blind person using a refreshable braille display.
#
# Copyright (C) 1995-2008 by The BRLTTY Developers.
#
# BRLTTY comes with ABSOLUTELY NO WARRANTY.
#
# This is free software, placed under the terms of the
# GNU Lesser General Public License, as published by the Free Software
# Foundation; either version 2.1 of the License, or (at your option) any
# later version. Please see the file LICENSE-LGPL for details.
#
# Web Page: http://mielke.cc/brltty/
#
# This software is maintained by Dave Mielke <dave@mielke.cc>.
###############################################################################

# German Braille Contraction Table
# Created by Mario Lang <mlang@delysid.org>.

class s s

numsign 3456  number sign, just one operand
letsign 6
capsign 46 # FIXME: only allowed at begword, midendword capsign is 45 
begcaps 45

# the decimal digits
always 1 1
always 2 12
always 3 14
always 4 145
always 5 15
always 6 124
always 7 1245
always 8 125
always 9 24
always 0 245

# the letter a
always a 1
always A 1
word aber 1
begword aber 2-1
midendword ach 56
word adonis = shouldn't use the nis-contraction
always aktuell 1-13-2345-136-15-12345 should use the ll-contraction
begmidword al 25
always all 1-12345
sufword alle 1-15
always allegor 1-12345-15-1245-26 Allegorie shouldn't use the ae-contraction
always allein 1-1246
word allem 1-12345-12356 shouldn't use the alle-contraction because of allemal
always allen 1-14
always aller 1-12456
always allerg 1-12345-12456-1245 Allergiker
always alles 1-123456
always allesamt 1-12345-15-234-1-134-2345 shouldn't use the es-contraction
always alphabet 25-1234-125-1-12-15-2345 shouldn't use the hab-contraction
word als 146
word also 1-135
begmidword an 235
always ander 2-12456
always änder 5-12456
word anis 235-24-234 shouldn't use the nis-contraction
begmidword ar 356
always arbeit 356-12
always arben 356-12-14
midendword ation 5-245
midendword ativ 5-1236
always au 16
word auch 34
word auf 16
always auf 2-16
begword aus 34
begword auspiz 16-234-1234-24-1356 shouldn't use the aus-contraction
begword aussprech 16-2-2346
midendword aussprech 16-234-2-2346
begword ausstell 16-2-13456
midendword ausstell 16-234-2-13456
always australi 16-23456-1235-25-24 shouldn't use the aus-contraction
always austria 16-23456-1235-24-1 shouldn't use the aus-contraction
#begword äuß 5-34 FIXME: how to deal with äußerst?

# the letter ä
always ä 345
always Ä 345
always äu 34
always ähnlich 345-456

# the letter b
always b 12
always B 12
word balsam 12-25-234-1-134
sufword barschaft 12-356-156-1-124-2345 shouldn't use the shaft-contraction
begmidword be 23
word been 12-15-15-1345 english word shouldn't use be- or en-contraction
always beere 12-15-15-1235-15
always beeren 12-15-15-1235-14
always behr 12-2356-1235 entbehren
word bei 12
always bei 2-12
begword beid 12-145 beiderseits
always belläng 12-13456-5-123-1245 Kabellänge shouldn't use the ll-contraction
always berg 12-12456-1245 shouldn't use the be-contraction
always besonder 23
always besser 234-234
always bis 12-234
always bison =
always bist 12-23456
always bleib 12-12
contraction bb
always blieb 12-123-346-12 dabeigeblieben shouldn't use the be-contraction
always blind 12-123
contraction bl
always brauch 2-34
always bräuch 5-34
always brief 12-124
contraction bf
always bring 12-1245
contraction bg

# the letter c
always c 6-14
always C 6-14
always ch 1456
contraction ch
always charakter 1456-13
sufword chor 1456-135-1235 shouldn't use the or-contraction
always ck 46
always comput 6-14-135-134-1234-136-2345 computer should use the er-contraction

# the letter d
always d 145
always D 145
always dabei 145-12
contraction db
always dadurch 145-145
contraction dd
always dafür 145-124
contraction df
always dagegen 145-1245
contraction dg
always daher 145-125
contraction dh
always damit 145-134
contraction dm
always dank 145-13
contraction dk
word das 145
word dass 2346
always davon 124-1236
contraction dv
always dazu 145-1356
contraction dz
always dazubleib 145-1-2-1356-12-12 shouldn't use the dazu-contraction
always dazumal 145-1-2-1356-134
always deuten 145-126-2345-14 shouldn't use the te-contraction
always deal = dealer
word dei = Agnus Dei
word dem 12356
always dem 2-12356
always demokrat 145-2345
contraction dt
word den 15
word denen 15-14
word dnister 145-1345-24-234-2345-12456 shouldn't use the nis-contraction
word denn 145-1345
word dennschon 145-1345-156-135-1345
word der 1235
word des 3
always dessen 145-2346
always deutsch 145-156
word dezimal = if we use the mal-contraction here, we get a new word dezim
sufword dezimal 145-15-1356-24-134-25
word die 346
word diem 145-24-12356 we shouldn't use the ie-contraction here
always diens 145-346-1345-234 dienstag
word diese 346-15
word diesen 346-14
word dieser 346-12456
word dieses 346-123456
sufword diesmal 346-134
word dir 145-1235
word doch 145-1456
always donners 145-135-1345-1345-12456-234 donnerstag
always druck 145-46
always drück 5-145-46
word durch 1456
always durch 2-1456
always dürfen 2-145-14
always dürfnis 2-145-1346
always dürft 2-145-2345

# the letter e
always e 15
always E 15
always eben 15-12-14
word ebenso 15-135
contraction eo
midword eh 2356
sufword ehemal 15-125-15-134
always ei 146
word ei 6-146
always eigen 146-1245-14 Eigennutz shouldn't use the ge-contraction
always ein 1246
always einander 2-1246
always el 13456
always em 12356
always en 14
word en 15-1345 en passant
always enig 14-45
begword ent 2346
always ente 14-236
always enten 14-2345-14 The te-contraction shouldn't be used here
always er 12456
always erkenn 12456-13-14-1345
always es 123456
sufword etwa 15-1
contraction ea
word etwas 2345-2456
contraction tw
always eu 126
begword ex 1346

# the letter f
always f 124
always F 124
always fahr 2-1235
always fähr 5-1235
endword falls 124
always fall 124-12345
always fäll 5-124-12345
always fertig 124-45
always fest 124-15-23456 should use the st-contraction
always film =
word firnis =
always folgen 124-135-123-1245-14 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
always frag 124-1235
contraction fr
always fragil =
always fragment 124-1235-1-1245-134-14-2345
always freund 124-145
contraction fd
always führ 124-125
contraction fh
word für 124
always für 2-124
always fürcht 124-1256-1235-1456-2345 shouldn't use the für-contraction

# the letter g
always g 1245
always G 1245
always ganz 1245-1356
contraction gz
always gänz 5-1245-1356
always garnison 1245-356-1345-24-234-135-1345 shouldn't use the nis-contraction
always ge 12346
always geben 12346-12-14 should use the en-contraction
word gegen 1245
always gegen 2-1245
word gegend 12346-1245-14-145 shouldn't use the gegen-contraction
always gegenüber 1245-1256
contraction gü
always gegenwart 1245-2456
contraction gw
always gegenwärt 5-1245-2456
word gel 1245-13456 should use the el-contraction
always gelb 1245-12346-12 should use the el-contraction
always geld 1245-12346-145 should use the el-contraction
always gelegen 1245-1245
contraction gg
prfword gen 1245-14
prfword gene 1245-14-15
always geogra = Geographie shouldn't use the ge-contraction
endword ger 1245-12456 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
endword gerin 1245-12456-35 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
endword gerinnen 1245-12456-35-1345-14 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
prfword gern 1245-12456-1345
midendword gerlich 1245-12456-456 bürgerlich shouldn't use the ge-contraction
always gern 1245-12456-1345 we shouldn't use the ge-contraction here
always geschäft 1245-124
contraction gf
always gesellschaft 1245-156
always gewesen 2-12346
always geworden 12346-2456
always gibt 1245-12
contraction gb
always gleich 1245-1456
always glück 1245-46
always groß 1245-2346
contraction gß
always größ 5-1245-2346
always grund 1245-145
contraction gd
always gründ 5-1245-145

# the letter h
always h 125
always H 125
always hab 2-125
always haft 125-124
contraction hf
always häft 5-125-124
word hain =
always hamburger 125-1-134-12-136-1235-1245-12456 shouldn't use the ge-contraction
always hand 125-145
always händ 5-125-145
always hast 125-23456
always hat 125-2345
contraction ht
always hatt 125
word hattest 125-15-23456 shouldn't use the es-contraction
word hattrick 125-1-2345-2345-24-46 shouldn't use the hatt-contraction
always hätt 345
always haupt 125-2345
contraction hp
midendword heit 125
always herr 1235-1235
contraction rr
always herrschaft 1235-1235-156-1-124-2345 shouldn't use the shaft-contraction
always hier 125-1235
contraction hr
always hierar 125-24-12456-356 hierarchie
always hoff 124-124
contraction ff

# the letter i
always i 24
always I 24
word ich 3456
midendword ich 3456
always ie 346
endword ien 24-14 shouldn't use the ie-contraction
midendword ig 45
word ihm 236
sufword ihn 24-125
sufword ihr 24
word im 36 not allowed when used in hyphenated words like Hans-im-Glück-Gefühl
always -im- =
word immer 1346
sufword immer 2-1346
always immersion 24-1346-12456-234-245 shouldn't use the immer-contraction
always in 35
always interess 2-35
always irgend 24-1245 irgendetwas
contraction ig
midendword ion 245
endword ismus 5-24
word ist 23456
endword istisch 5-156
endword ität 5-345

# the letter j
always j 245
always J 245
always jahr 245-1235
contraction jr
always jähr 5-245-1235
always jahrhundert 245-125
contraction jh
always jahrtausend 245-2345
contraction jt
always jahrzehnt 245-1356
contraction jz
sufword jed 245-145
word jedoch 245-1456
sufword jetzig 245-45
word jetzt 245
always jetzt 2-245
always johannisberg 245-135-125-235-1345-24-234-12-12456-1245 shouldn't use the nis-contraction
always jung 245-256-1245 shouldn't use the ung-contraction
# the letter k
always k 13
always K 13
word kann 13
word kannst 13-23456
always kapital 13-1234
contraction kp
always kapitäl 5-13-1234
midendword keit 13
always klemm 13-123-15-1346 eingeklemmt shouldn't use the em-contraction
always knoch 13-1345-135-1456 Knochen shouldn't use the noch-contraction
always komm 13-1346
contraction kx
always kömm 5-13-1346
always konnt 13-2345
contraction kt
always könn 2-13
always kräft 5-13-124
always kulturell 13-136-123-2345-136-1235-15-12345 should use the ll-contraction
always kürz 5-13-1356

# the letter l
always l 123
always L 123
always lang 123-1245
contraction lg
always läng 5-123-1245
always langobard 123-235-1245-135-12-356-145 shouldn't use the lang-contraction
always lass 2-123
always läss 5-123
always laich 123-1-24-1456 shouldn't use the ich-contraction
always lasagne = shouldn't use the sag-contraction
always lasso 123-1-2346-135 shouldn't use the lass-contraction
always länd =
word lässt 123
always leb 123-12
contraction lb
always leicht 123-2345
always lese 123-123456-15 Leseschwierigkeiten
word lesen 123-123456-14
word leser 123-123456-12456
word leserin 123-123456-12456-35
word leserinnen 123-123456-12456-35-1345-1246
always letzt 123-2345
contraction lt
midendword lich 456
always lieb 123-346-12
always ll 12345

# the letter m
always m 134
always M 134
midendword mal 134
word man 134
always manuell 134-235-136-15-12345 shouldn't use the ue-contraction
always mann 134-1345
contraction mn
always männ 5-134-1345
word manna = shouldn't use the mann-contraction
always mannequin 134-235-1345-15-6-12345-35 shouldn't use the mann-contraction
always maschin 134-156
always material 134-123
contraction ml
always materiell 134-12345
word mehr 2356
word mir 134-1235
word mit 2345
always mit 2-2345
always mittel 134-2345
contraction mt
midendword mm 1346
always moldawien 134-135-123-145-1-2456-24-14 shouldn't use the wie-contraction
sufword moor = shouldn't use the or-contraction
always möchte 1456-15
word möchten 1456-14
always mög 2-246
always möglich 134-456
always museum =
always musik 134-13
contraction mk
always muss 134-2346
always müss 2-134
